Tennessee, session 114, SB2545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-414(e), is amended by
deleting "ninety (90)" wherever it appears and substituting "one hundred twenty (120)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2545
012234
- 1 -